Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1012
Mailboxes; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates the provisions of section 39-1010 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1961, c. 194, § 3, p. 594;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 210.